Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 3. Actions Relating to Nonconsensual Common Law Liens.

Opinions of attorney general. —

“Common law liens at law” and “claims of common law” which are filed in connection with lawsuits unrelated to the title or right to possession of real property are not legally effective for any purpose whatsoever. Such documents may not legally be recorded and the recorder should not record these documents. Since common law liens that were mistakenly recorded by the recorder’s office were unauthorized documents which should not have been recorded, their recording does not give constructive notice of their contents to anyone and the recordation of those unauthorized documents is void and of no legal effect. March 24, 1980, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 09.45.161.
Lien against public servant.

If a nonconsensual common law lien is recorded or filed against the property of a public servant based upon the performance or nonperformance of the public servant’s duties or having no stated basis and the nonconsensual common law lien was not accompanied by a specific order from a court of competent jurisdiction recognized under state or federal law authorizing the filing of the lien and recorded or filed with the lien, an attorney representing the public servant

may sign, submit for recording or filing, and record or file a notice of invalid lien; and

shall mail a copy of the notice of invalid lien submitted for recording or filing under (1) of this section to the person who recorded or filed the lien at the person’s last known address.

History.

(§ 2 ch 20 SLA 1998)

Sec. 09.45.164.
Request for release of nonconsensual common law lien.

A person whose real or personal property is subject to a claim of nonconsensual common law lien that has been recorded or filed may submit to a court of competent jurisdiction a request that the court order the release of the claim of the nonconsensual common law lien. The request must state the grounds upon which relief is sought and must be supported by the affidavit of the person making the request or that person’s attorney setting out a concise statement of the facts upon which the request is based.

If facts alleging the need for an expedited decision are averred, the request may ask the court to order the person claiming the nonconsensual common law lien to appear at a hearing within 20 days of the service of the request and order on the lien claimant. The order may be granted ex parte and shall state that, if the lien claimant fails to appear at the time and place specified, the claim of nonconsensual common law lien shall be released, and the lien claimant shall be ordered to pay the costs and actual reasonable attorney fees incurred by the party making the request.

If the court determines that the claim of nonconsensual common law lien is invalid, the court shall issue an order releasing the claim of lien and awarding costs and actual reasonable attorney fees to the party making the request. If the court determines that the claim of nonconsensual common law lien is valid, the court shall issue an order stating the claim of the lien is valid and shall award costs and actual reasonable attorney fees to the lien claimant.

History.

(§ 2 ch 20 SLA 1998)

Sec. 09.45.167.
Liability of nonconsensual common law lien claimant or grantee.

A person who offers a claim of nonconsensual common law lien for recording or filing that is not accompanied by a specific order from a court of competent jurisdiction recognized under state or federal law authorizing the recording or filing of the lien is liable to the owner of the property affected by the lien for actual and punitive damages, as well as costs and actual reasonable attorney fees.

A grantee or other person purportedly benefited by a claim of nonconsensual common law lien that has been recorded or filed who refuses to release the lien upon request of the owner of the property affected by the lien is liable to the owner for actual and punitive damages, as well as costs and actual reasonable attorney fees.

History.

(§ 2 ch 20 SLA 1998)

Sec. 09.45.169.
Definitions.

In AS

09.45.161

—

09.45.169

,

“filed” means the acceptance of a document by a department or person having responsibility for the receipt and filing of documents that may be filed and that are presented for filing in the place of filing designated by law, whether or not under applicable law the department or person is directed to file the document;

“nonconsensual common law lien” means a lien on real or personal property that

is not provided for by a specific state or federal statute or municipal ordinance;

does not depend on the consent of the owner of the property affected for its existence; and

is not an equitable, constructive, or other lien imposed by a court recognized under state or federal law;

“public servant” means each of the following, whether compensated or not:

an officer or employee of the state, a municipality or other political subdivision of the state, or a governmental instrumentality of the state;

a person who serves as a member of a board or commission created by statute or by legislative, judicial, or administrative action by the state, a municipality or other political subdivision of the state, or a governmental instrumentality;

an officer or employee of a federal agency, a member of the military or naval forces of the United States, a member of the National Guard while engaged in training or duty, or a person acting on behalf of a federal agency in an official capacity, temporarily or permanently in the service of the United States, whether with or without compensation; or

a person nominated, elected, appointed, employed, or designated to act in a capacity defined in (A) — (C) of this paragraph, but who does not occupy the position;

“record” means the acceptance of a document by the recorder that the recorder has determined is recordable under AS 40.17 and that is presented for recording in the place of recording designated for the recording district where affected property is located whether or not the place of recording is in that district and whether or not under applicable law the recorder is directed to record the document;

“recorder” means the commissioner of natural resources or the person designated by the commissioner of natural resources to perform the duties set out in AS 40.17.

History.

(§ 2 ch 20 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 2017)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective June 13, 2017, added “or municipal ordinance” at the end of (2)(A).